Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB60.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 446.350 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Government action" means the implementation or application of any law,
including but not limited to state and local laws, ordinances, rules,
regulations, and policies, or other action by the Commonwealth or any
political subdivision of the Commonwealth, or any city, county, urban-
county government, charter county government, consolidated local
government, unified local government, municipality, instrumentality, or
public official authorized by law in the Commonwealth; and
(b) 1. "Substantially burden" means the taking of any action that curtails or
denies the right to act or the right to refuse to act in a manner
motivated by a sincerely held religious belief; and
2. As used in this subsection, "action" includes but is not limited to:
a. Withholding benefits;
b. Assessing criminal, civil, or administrative penalties; or
c. Excluding from governmental programs or access to
governmental facilities.
(2) Government action shall not substantially burden a person's freedom of religion.
The right to act or refuse to act in a manner motivated by a sincerely held religious
belief may not be substantially burdened unless it is proven[the government proves]
by clear and convincing evidence that the government[it] has:
(a) A compelling governmental interest in infringing the specific act or refusal to
act; and[ has]
(b) Used the least restrictive means to further that interest[. A "burden" shall
include indirect burdens such as withholding benefits, assessing penalties, or
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/4/2025 10:10 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 34
an exclusion from programs or access to facilities].
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a person whose religious
exercise has been substantially burdened in violation of this section may assert
that violation as a claim or defense in a judicial or administrative proceeding and
obtain appropriate relief, which shall include but is not limited to:
(a) Injunctive relief;
(b) Declaratory relief;
(c) Compensatory damages;
(d) Costs; and
(e) Attorney's fees.
(4) This statute applies to all government action whether adopted before or after the
effective date of this Act. State laws enacted after the effective date of this Act are
subject to this section unless this statute is explicitly excluded. This section shall
not be construed to authorize any government action to burden any religious
belief.
(5) If any provision of this section or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the
section that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and
to this end the provisions of this section are severable.
(6) Sovereign and governmental immunity are waived to the extent of liability created
under this section.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/4/2025 10:10 AM Jacketed